Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 6 Registration of Voters
21-2-221.1.
Voter registration incorporated into resident hunting, fishing, or trapping license; design of forms; record keeping; opting out by businesses selling alcohol for on-premises consumption.

Each application to obtain a resident hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by the Department of Natural Resources pursuant to Chapter 2 of Title 27 and made by an applicant who is within six months of such applicant’s eighteenth birthday or older shall also serve as an application for voter registration unless the applicant declines to register to vote through specific declination or by failing to sign the voter registration application.

The Board of Natural Resources and the Secretary of State shall agree upon and design such procedures and forms as will be necessary to comply with this Code section, including without limitation procedures applicable to processing of applications received by persons approved as license agents for the Department of Natural Resources pursuant to Code Section 27-2-2.

The forms designed by the Board of Natural Resources and the Secretary of State:

Shall not require the applicant to duplicate any information required in the resident hunting, fishing, or trapping license portion of the application with the exception of a second signature;

Shall include such information as required on other voter registration cards issued by the Secretary of State;

Shall contain a statement that states each eligibility requirement contained in Code Section 21-2-216, that contains an attestation that the applicant meets each such requirement, and that requires the signature of the applicant under penalty of false swearing; and

Shall include, in print that is identical to that used in the attestation, the penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter registration application; and a statement that, if an applicant declines to register to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.

Any person when acting as a license agent for the Department of Natural Resources shall not:

Seek to influence an applicant’s political preference;

Display on his or her person any such political preference or political party or body allegiance;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from applying to register to vote; or

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to apply to register or not to apply to register to vote has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.

License agents for the Department of Natural Resources acting under this Code section shall not be considered to be deputy registrars under this chapter or any rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

The Department of Natural Resources shall transmit the completed applications for voter registration to the Secretary of State at the conclusion of each business day. The Secretary of State shall forward the applications to the appropriate county board of registrars to determine the eligibility of the applicant and, if found eligible, to add the applicant’s name to the list of electors and to place the applicant in the correct precinct and voting districts.

The Department of Natural Resources shall maintain such statistical records on the number of registrations and declinations as requested by the Secretary of State.

Information relating to the failure of an applicant for a resident hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by the Department of Natural Resources to sign a voter registration application shall not be used for any purpose other than voter registration and shall not be subject to public inspection.

The Secretary of State and the Board of Natural Resources shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations to provide for the transmission of voter registration applications and signatures electronically. Such electronically transmitted signatures shall be valid as signatures on the voter registration application and shall be treated in all respects as a manually written original signature and shall be recognized as such in any matter concerning the voter registration application.

The forms and procedures to implement and administer this Code section shall be designed in a manner such that license agents for the Department of Natural Resources shall not incur any expenses nor be required to make any reports in implementing and administering this Code section in addition to those presently required of such license agents in issuing fishing, hunting, and trapping licenses, other than providing information to the Department of Natural Resources at the time the license application is processed necessary to comply with state and federal voter laws on voter registration.

License agents for the Department of Natural Resources acting under this Code section whose businesses are authorized to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption may notify the Department of Natural Resources of their desire to opt out of the requirements of this Code section and shall thereafter not be required to comply with this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-221.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 732, § 2.

21-2-221.2.
Voter registration application for electronic voter registration.

A person who is qualified to register to vote in this state and who has a valid Georgia driver’s license or identification card may submit a voter registration application on the Internet website of the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall, in conjunction with the Department of Driver Services, design and implement a system to allow for such electronic voter registration.

An application submitted pursuant to this Code section shall contain:

The applicant’s name and residence address;

The applicant’s driver’s license or identification card number;

The applicant’s date of birth;

An affirmation by the applicant that the applicant is a citizen of the State of Georgia and of the United States;

An affirmation by the applicant that the information provided is truthful and that the applicant is eligible to vote in the State of Georgia;

An assent by the applicant to the use of his or her signature from his or her driver’s license or identification card; and

Such other information the Secretary of State deems necessary to establish the identity of the applicant.

Upon the submission of an application through the website pursuant to this Code section, the software used by the Secretary of State for processing applications through the website shall provide for immediate verification of all of the following:

That the applicant has a valid Georgia driver’s license or identification card and that the number for that driver’s license or identification card provided by the applicant matches the number for the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card that is on file with the Department of Driver Services;

That the date of birth provided by the applicant matches the date of birth that is on file with the Department of Driver Services; and

That the applicant is a citizen of the State of Georgia and of the United States and that the information provided by the applicant matches the information on file with the Department of Driver Services.

If any of these items do not match or if the application is incomplete, the application shall be void and shall be rejected and the applicant shall be notified of such rejection either electronically or by mail within five days after such application is rejected.

If all of the items enumerated in subsection (c) of this Code section are verified, the Secretary of State shall obtain an electronic copy of the applicant’s signature from the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card on file with the Department of Driver Services. The application shall then be processed in the same manner as applications under Code Section 21-2-221. Except as otherwise provided by this Code section, the application shall be deemed to have been made as of the date that the information was provided by the applicant through the Internet website.

The matching of information pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section shall satisfy the requirements of subsection (g) of Code Section 21-2-216.

The Secretary of State shall employ security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter registration applications submitted electronically pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-221.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 16/SB 92.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, “do” was substituted for “does” in the ending undesignated paragraph of subsection (c).

21-2-222.
Designated voter registration agencies and offices; definitions; duties of agencies and offices.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Persons with disabilities” means persons who have physical disabilities, including, but not limited to, any physical or neurological impairment which severely restricts a person’s mobility or manual dexterity; substantial loss of speech, sight, or hearing; or loss of one or more limbs or use thereof; but such term shall not include nonphysical disabilities, mental or emotional disabilities, or disabilities based upon substance abuse.

“Public assistance” means the food stamp program; the Medicaid program; the Women, Infants, and Children program; and the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program.

“Recruitment office of the armed forces of the United States” includes both regular and reserve forces recruitment offices and national guard recruitment offices.

Each office in this state:

Which provides public assistance;

Which provides state funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities; and

Which is a recruitment office of the armed forces of the United States located within this state

shall be designated voter registration agencies.

In addition to the offices listed in subsection (b) of this Code section, the Secretary of State shall designate other offices within the state as designated voter registration offices. Such offices may include, but not be limited to:

State or local governmental offices such as public libraries, public schools, offices of county and municipal clerks, and government revenue offices; and

Federal and nongovernmental offices, with the agreement of such offices.

At each designated voter registration agency, the following services shall be made available:

Distribution of the mail voter registration application provided for in Code Section 21-2-223 in accordance with subsection (f) of this Code section;

Assistance to applicants in completing voter registration application forms, unless the applicant refuses such assistance; and

Acceptance of completed voter registration application forms for submission to the Secretary of State.

If a designated voter registration agency under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section provides services to a person with a disability at the person’s home, the agency shall provide the services described in subsection (d) of this Code section at such person’s home.

A designated voter registration agency that provides service or assistance in addition to conducting voter registration shall:

Distribute with each application for such service or assistance and with each recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to such service or assistance, when such application, recertification, renewal, or change of address is made in person, the mail voter registration application form provided for in Code Section 21-2-223 unless the applicant declines in writing to register to vote;

Distribute a form provided by the Secretary of State to accompany the voter registration application form which includes:

The question “If you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here today?”;

If the agency provides public assistance, the statement “Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency.”;

Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant is presently registered, would like to register, or declines to register to vote with the statement “IF YOU DO NOT CHECK ANY BOX, YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.” in close proximity to the boxes and in prominent type;

The statements “If you would like help in filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill out the application in private.”; and

The statement “If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to vote or your right to privacy in deciding whether to register or in applying to register to vote, you may file a complaint with the Secretary of State at (insert address and telephone number).”; and

Provide to each applicant who does not decline to apply to register to vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the voter registration application form as is provided by the office with regard to the completion of its own forms, unless the applicant refuses such assistance.

If an applicant fails to check any box on the form required by subparagraph (f)(2)(C) of this Code section, the applicant shall be deemed to have declined to apply to register to vote.

No information relating to a declination to apply to register to vote in connection with an application made at an office described in subsection (f) of this Code section may be used for any purpose other than voter registration and shall not be subject to public inspection.

Each office shall transmit the completed voter registration application forms to the Secretary of State at least once per week, except that, during the 15 days leading up to a registration deadline for a primary or election, such applications shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State at the conclusion of each business day. The Secretary of State shall forward the applications to the appropriate county board of registrars to determine the eligibility of the applicant and, if found eligible, to add the applicant’s name to the list of electors and to place the applicant in the correct precinct and voting districts.

Each office shall maintain such statistical records on the number of registrations and declinations as requested by the Secretary of State.

Persons providing the services described in subsection (d) of this Code section shall not:

Seek to influence an applicant’s political preference;

Display any such political preference or political party or body allegiance;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from applying to register to vote; or

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to apply to register or not to apply to register to vote has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.

The Secretary of State shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations to provide for the transmission of voter registration applications and signatures electronically from public assistance offices, offices which provide state funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities, and recruitment offices of the armed forces of the United States located within this state. Such electronically transmitted signatures shall be valid as signatures on the voter registration application and shall be treated in all respects as a manually written original signature and shall be recognized as such in any matter concerning the voter registration application.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-222

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 17; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 19.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for voter registration by registrars and deputy registrars, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.03.

Registration of persons by college presidents or their designees, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.05.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

21-2-223.
Mail voter registration application forms.

The Secretary of State shall design, publish, and distribute voter registration application forms with which a person may apply to register to vote by completing and mailing the form to the Secretary of State or to the board of registrars of the person’s county of residence. The Secretary of State shall forward the applications that he or she receives to the appropriate county board of registrars to determine the eligibility of the applicant and, if found eligible, to add the applicant’s name to the list of electors and to place the applicant in the correct precinct and voting districts.

The county boards of registrars shall obtain and maintain a supply of mail voter registration application forms for distribution and for voter registration. In addition, each state, county, and municipal office, except an office which is a designated voter registration office under Code Section 21-2-222, which has regular contact with the public shall obtain a supply of mail voter registration application forms from the Secretary of State and make such applications available for use by citizens to register to vote.

The mail voter registration application forms shall be made available through governmental and private entities with particular emphasis on making such forms available for organized voter registration programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-223

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 9/HB 540.

21-2-224.
Registration deadlines; restrictions on voting in primaries; official list of electors; voting procedure when portion of county changed from one county to another.

If any person whose name is not on the list of registered electors maintained by the Secretary of State under this article desires to vote at any general primary, general election, or presidential preference primary, such person shall make application as provided in this article by the close of business on the fifth Monday or, if such Monday is a legal holiday, by the close of business on the following business day prior to the date of such general primary, general election, or presidential preference primary.

If any person whose name is not on the list of registered electors maintained by the Secretary of State under this article desires to vote at any special primary or special election, such person shall make application as provided in this article no later than either the close of business on the fifth day after the date of the call for the special primary or special election, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays of this state or the close of business on the fifth Monday prior to the date of the special primary or special election or, if such Monday is a legal holiday, by the close of business on the following business day, whichever is later; except that:

If such special primary or special election is held in conjunction with a general primary, general election, or presidential preference primary, the registration deadline for such special primary or special election shall be the same as the registration deadline for the general primary, general election, or presidential preference primary in conjunction with which the special primary or special election is being conducted; or

If such special primary or special election is not held in conjunction with a general primary, general election, or presidential preference primary but is held on one of the dates specified in Code Section 21-2-540 for the conduct of special elections to present a question to the voters or special primaries or elections to fill vacancies in elected county or municipal offices, the registration deadline for such a special primary or election shall be at the close of business on the fifth Monday prior to the date of the special primary or election or, if such Monday is a legal holiday, by the close of business on the following business day.

Mail voter registration applications shall be deemed to have been made as of the date of the postmark affixed to such application by the United States Postal Service or, if no such postmark is affixed or if the postmark affixed by the United States Postal Service is illegible or bears no date, such application shall be deemed to have been made timely if received through the United States mail by the Secretary of State no later than the close of business on the fourth Friday prior to a general primary, general election, presidential preference primary, or special primary or special election held in conjunction with a general primary, general election, or presidential preference primary or special primary or special election held on one of the dates specified in Code Section 21-2-540 for the conduct of special elections to present questions to the voters or special primaries or special elections to fill vacancies in elected county or municipal offices or no later than the close of business on the ninth day after the date of the call, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays of this state, for all other special primaries and special elections.

(c.1)

An individual or organization shall promptly transmit all completed voter registration applications to the Secretary of State or the appropriate board of registrars within ten days after receiving such application or by the close of registration, whichever period is earlier. If an individual or organization receives a completed voter registration application 14 or fewer days before the close of registration, the individual or organization shall transmit the application to the Secretary of State or the appropriate board of registrars within 72 hours of the date of the execution of the application or by midnight on the close of registration, whichever period is earlier.

Each elector who makes timely application for registration, is found eligible by the board of registrars and placed on the official list of electors, and is not subsequently found to be disqualified to vote shall be entitled to vote in any primary or election; provided, however, that an elector, voting in the primary or primaries held by a single party for the nomination of candidates to seek public offices to be filled in an election, shall not vote in a primary held by any other party for the nomination of candidates to seek public offices to be filled in the same such election.

The county board of registrars shall deliver to the municipality, upon a basis mutually agreed upon between the county board of registrars and the governing authority of the municipality, a copy of the list of electors for the municipality for the primary or election. Such list shall be delivered not earlier than the fifth Monday prior to a primary or election and not later than 21 days prior to such primary or election for the purpose of permitting the municipality to check the accuracy of the list. The municipality shall, upon receipt of the county registration list, or as soon as practicable thereafter but in no event later than five days prior to such primary or election, review such list and identify in writing to the county board of registrars any names on the electors list of persons who are not qualified to vote at such primary or election, stating the reason for disqualification. The county board of registrars shall challenge the persons identified in accordance with Code Section 21-2-228. In addition, the county board of registrars shall provide a list of inactive electors for the municipality. The municipality shall certify such lists and file with the city clerk a copy showing the names of electors entitled to vote at such primary or election.

The official list of electors eligible to vote in any primary or election shall be prepared and completed at least five calendar days prior to the date of the primary or election in which the list is to be used.

The official list of electors and the official list of inactive electors prepared and distributed to the poll officers of each precinct shall include only the elector’s name, address, ZIP Code, date of birth, voter identification number, a designation of whether the elector registered for the first time in this state and is required to comply with Code Section 21-2-216, a designation of whether the elector registered for the first time in this state by mail and is required to comply with Code Sections 21-2-220 and 21-2-417, congressional district, state Senate district, state House district, county commission district, if any, county or independent board of education district, if any, and municipal governing authority district designations, if any, and such other voting districts, if any. The official list of electors and the official list of inactive electors prepared and distributed to the poll officers of each precinct may also include codes designating that an elector has voted by absentee ballot, has been challenged, or has been sent mail by the registrars which has been returned marked undeliverable. No person whose name does not appear on the official list of electors shall vote or be allowed to vote at any election, except as otherwise provided in this article. The county registrars shall ensure that the information required to notify poll officers that an elector registered to vote for the first time in this state by mail and must comply with subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-220 and subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-417 is placed on each list of electors to be used at a polling place.

All persons whose names appear on the list of electors placed in the possession of the managers in each precinct and no others, except as otherwise provided in this article, shall be allowed to deposit their ballots according to law at the precinct in which they are registered.

When any portion of a county or municipality is changed from one county or municipality to another, the persons who would have been qualified to vote in the county or municipality from which taken, at the time of any primary or election, shall vote in the county or municipality to which they are removed; and, if required to swear or certify, the oath or certification may be so qualified as to contain this fact. The name of such elector shall be kept and checked as provided in Code Section 21-2-228.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-224

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1044, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 21; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 151, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 20; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 25/HB 244; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 10/HB 540; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 17/SB 92; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 9/HB 268.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (e), deleted “the chief registrar of” preceding “the municipality” near the beginning of the first sentence and near the end of the second sentence, and substituted “municipality” for “municipal registrar” near the beginning of the third and last sentences.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Preparation of the electors list and use of ExpressPoll, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.07.

Acceptance of voter registration applications, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.01.

21-2-225.
Confidentiality of original registration applications; limitations on registration data available for public inspection; data made available by Secretary of State; membership in nongovernmental entity for purpose of sharing and exchanging information to improve accuracy and efficiency of voter registration systems.

Neither the original applications for voter registration nor any copies thereof shall be open for public inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Except as provided in Code Section 21-2-225.1, all data collected and maintained on electors whose names appear on the list of electors maintained by the Secretary of State pursuant to this article shall be available for public inspection with the exception of bank statements submitted pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-220 and subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-417, the month and day of birth, the social security numbers, e-mail addresses, and driver’s license numbers of the electors, and the locations at which the electors applied to register to vote, which shall remain confidential and shall be used only for voter registration purposes; provided, however, that any and all information relating to the dates of birth, social security numbers, and driver’s license numbers of electors may be made available to other agencies of this state, to agencies of other states and territories of the United States, and to agencies of the federal government if the agency is authorized to maintain such information and the information is used only to identify the elector on the receiving agency’s data base and is not disseminated further and remains confidential. Information regarding an elector’s year of birth shall be available for public inspection.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to furnish copies of such data as may be collected and maintained on electors whose names appear on the list of electors maintained by the Secretary of State pursuant to this article, within the limitations provided in this article, on electronic media or computer run list or both. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Secretary of State shall establish the cost to be charged for such data. The Secretary of State may contract with private vendors to make such data available in accordance with this subsection. Such data may not be used by any person for commercial purposes.

The Secretary of State may become a member of a nongovernmental entity whose purpose is to share and exchange information in order to improve the accuracy and efficiency of voter registration systems. The membership of the nongovernmental entity shall be composed solely of election officials of state and territorial governments of the United States, except that such membership may also include election officials of the District of Columbia.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Secretary of State may share confidential and exempt information after becoming a member of such nongovernmental entity as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

The Secretary of State may become a member of such nongovernmental entity only if such entity is controlled and operated by the participating jurisdictions. The entity shall not be operated or controlled by the federal government or any other entity acting on behalf of the federal government. The Secretary of State must be able to withdraw at any time from any such membership in such nongovernmental entity.

If the Secretary of State becomes a member of such nongovernmental entity, the Department of Driver Services shall, pursuant to an agreement with the Secretary of State, provide driver’s license or identification card information related to voter eligibility to the Secretary of State for the purpose of sharing and exchanging voter registration information with such nongovernmental entity.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, upon the Secretary of State becoming a member of a nongovernmental entity as provided in this subsection, information received by the Secretary of State from the nongovernmental entity is exempt from disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 and any other provision of law. However, the Secretary of State may provide such information to the boards of registrars to conduct voter registration list maintenance activities.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-225

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 6; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 21; Ga. L. 2004, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 26/HB 244; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 8/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2009, p. 316, § 1/HB 227; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 11/HB 540; Ga. L. 2011, p. 590, § 1/HB 143; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 7/SB 82; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 7/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, added subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-225.1.
Confidentiality of address of registered electors; term of request; procedure.

Any registered elector in this state who has obtained a protective order under Code Section 19-13-4 or under a similar provision of law in another state or who has obtained a restraining order or protective order under Code Section 16-5-94 or under a similar provision of law in another state may request the board of registrars of such elector’s county of residence to make such elector’s residence address confidential. An elector who is a bona fide resident of a family violence shelter, as defined in Code Section 19-13-20, may request to have his or her address made confidential without having to obtain a restraining order or protective order.

Upon the filing of a request with an affidavit under oath with the board of registrars by a registered elector stating that the elector has obtained a protective order under Code Section 19-13-4 or similar provision of law from another state or a restraining order or protective order under Code Section 16-5-94 or a similar provision of law of another state or, if the elector is a resident of a family violence shelter, a certification by the operators of such family violence shelter that such elector is a bona fide resident of such shelter, the registrars shall immediately review such request and supporting documents and, if such request and documentation is sufficient, shall approve the request and immediately take such steps as necessary to make the residence address of the elector confidential.

A request under this Code section, once approved, shall be effective for a period of four years following its approval by the registrars and may be renewed for additional four-year periods by the filing of a new request with the supporting documentation required by subsection (b) of this Code section prior to the end of each four-year period. If the elector registers to vote in another county in this state or another state, a new request for confidentiality of the elector’s residence address with the supporting documentation required in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be filed with the new county in order to continue the confidentiality of the elector’s residence address or the confidentiality shall terminate.

The Secretary of State shall provide by procedure, rule, or regulation for the mechanism by which such information shall be made confidential on the voter registration data base and may provide for forms for use in making such requests and for the use of alternate addresses for electors who file requests for the confidentiality of their residence addresses.

Information made confidential pursuant to this Code section shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-225.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 316, § 2/HB 227.